Washington statutes.
RCW 43.168.150

Minority and women-owned businesses—Application process—Joint loan guarantee program.

Subject to the restrictions contained in this chapter, the director is authorized to approve applications of minority and women-owned businesses for loans or loan guarantees from the fund. Applications approved by the director under this chapter shall conform to applicable federal requirements. The director shall prioritize available funds for loan guarantees rather than loans when possible. The director may enter into agreements with other public or private lending institutions to develop a joint loan guarantee program for minority and women-owned businesses. If such a program is developed, the director may provide funds, in conjunction with the other organizations, to operate the program. This section does not preclude the director from making individual loan guarantees.

To the maximum extent practicable, the funds available under this section shall be made available on an equal basis to minority and women-owned businesses. The director shall submit to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives quarterly reports that detail the number of loans approved and the characteristics of the recipients by ethnic and gender groups.

[ 2005 c 136 s 11; 1993 c 512 s 13.]

NOTES:

Savings—Effective date—2005 c 136: See notes following RCW 43.168.020.